Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0063.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1901. As used in this part: (a) "Board" means the Michigan natural resources trust fund board established in section 1905. (b) "Local unit of government or public authority" means a county, board of county road commissioners, city, township, village, school district, the Huron-Clinton metropolitan authority, or any authority composed of counties, cities, townships, villages, or school districts, or any combination of these entities. , and legally constituted to provide public recreation. (c) "Michigan state parks endowment fund" means the Michigan state parks endowment fund established in section 35a of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and provided for in section 74119. (d) "Trust fund" means the Michigan natural resources trust fund established in section 35 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 1903. (1) Subject to the limitations of this part and of section 35 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the interest and earnings of the trust fund in any 1 state fiscal year may be expended in subsequent state fiscal years only for the following purposes: (a) Acquisition of land or rights in land for recreational uses or protection of the land because of its environmental importance or its scenic beauty by a state department, local unit of government, or public authority, acting alone or in partnership with 1 or more state departments, local units of government, or public authorities. (b) Development, renovation, and redevelopment of public recreation facilities by a state department, local unit of government, or public authority, acting alone or in partnership with 1 or more state departments, local units of government, or public authorities. (c) Administration of the trust fund, including payments in lieu of taxes on state-owned land purchased through the trust fund. The legislature shall make appropriations from the trust fund each state fiscal year to make full payments in lieu of taxes on state-owned land purchased through the trust fund, as provided in section 2154. (2) An expenditure from the trust fund may be made in the form of a grant to a local unit of government or public authority, acting alone or in partnership with 1 or more state departments, local units of government, or public authorities, subject to all of the following conditions: (a) The grant is used for the purposes described in subsection (1). (b) The grant is matched by the local unit units of government or public authority authorities with at least 25% of the total cost of the project. (3) Not less than 25% of the money made available for expenditure from the trust fund from any state fiscal year shall be expended for acquisition of land and rights in land for recreational uses or protection of the land because of its environmental importance or its scenic beauty, and not less than 25% of the money made available for expenditure from the trust fund from any state fiscal year shall be expended for development, renovation, and redevelopment of public recreation facilities. (4) If property that was acquired with money from the trust fund is subsequently sold or transferred by this state to a nongovernmental entity, this state shall forward to the state treasurer for deposit into the trust fund an amount of money equal to the following: (a) If the property was acquired solely with trust fund money, the greatest of the following: (i) The net proceeds of the sale. (ii) The fair market value of the property at the time of the sale or transfer. (iii) The amount of money that was expended from the trust fund to acquire the property. (b) If the property was acquired with a combination of trust fund money and other restricted funding sources governed by federal or state law, an amount equal to the percentage of the funds contributed by the trust fund for the acquisition of the property multiplied by the greatest of the amounts under subdivision (a)(i), (ii), and (iii). (5) This part is subject to section 2132a.